Montana, session 2025, HB57.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 87-2-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-2-101. Definitions. As used in Title 87, chapter 3, and this chapter, unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Angling" or "fishing" means to take or harvest fish or the act of a person possessing any
instrument, article, or substance for the purpose of taking or harvesting fish in any location that a fish might
inhabit.
(2) (a) "Bait" means any animal matter, vegetable matter, or natural or artificial scent placed in an
area inhabited by wildlife for the purpose of attracting game animals or game birds.
(b) The term does not include:
(i) decoys, silhouettes, or other replicas of wildlife body forms;
(ii) scents used only to mask human odor; or
(iii) types of scents that are approved by the commission for attracting game animals or game
birds.
(3) "Fur-bearing animals" means marten or sable, otter, muskrat, fisher, mink, bobcat, lynx,
wolverine, northern swift fox, and beaver.
(4) "Game animals" means deer, elk, moose, antelope, caribou, mountain sheep, mountain goat,
mountain lion, bear, and wild buffalo.
(5) "Game fish" means all species of the family Salmonidae (chars, trout, salmon, grayling, and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 57

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 57.1
whitefish); all species of the genus Sander (sandpike or sauger and walleyed pike or yellowpike perch); all
species of the genus Esox (northern pike, pickerel, and muskellunge); all species of the genus Micropterus
(bass); all species of the genus Polyodon (paddlefish); all species of the family Acipenseridae (sturgeon); all
species of the genus Lota (burbot or ling); the species Perca flavescens (yellow perch); all species of the genus
Pomoxis (crappie); and the species Ictalurus punctatus (channel catfish).
(6) "Hunt" means to pursue, shoot, wound, take, harvest, kill, chase, lure, possess, or capture or
the act of a person possessing a weapon, as defined in 45-2-101, or using a dog or a bird of prey for the
purpose of shooting, wounding, taking, harvesting, killing, possessing, or capturing wildlife protected by the
laws of this state in any location that wildlife may inhabit, whether or not the wildlife is then or subsequently
taken. The term includes an attempt to take or harvest by any means, including but not limited to pursuing,
shooting, wounding, killing, chasing, luring, possessing, or capturing.
(7) "Migratory game birds" means waterfowl, including wild ducks, wild geese, brant, and swans;
cranes, including little brown and sandhill; rails, including coots; Wilson's snipes or jacksnipes; and mourning
doves.
(8) "Nongame wildlife" means any wild mammal, bird, amphibian, reptile, fish, mollusk, crustacean,
or other animal not otherwise legally classified by statute or regulation of this state.
(9) "Open season" means the time during which game birds, game fish, game animals, and fur-
bearing animals may be lawfully taken.
(10) "Person" means an individual, association, partnership, or corporation.
(11) "Predatory animals" means coyote, weasel, skunk, and civet cat.
(12) "Trap" means to take or harvest or participate in the taking or harvesting of any wildlife
protected by the laws of the state by setting or placing any mechanical device, snare, deadfall, pit, or device
intended to take wildlife or to remove wildlife from any of these devices.
(13) "Upland game birds" means sharp-tailed grouse, blue grouse, spruce (Franklin) grouse, prairie
chicken, sage hen or sage grouse, ruffed grouse, ring-necked pheasant, Hungarian partridge, ptarmigan, wild
turkey, and chukar partridge, California quail, and Gambel's quail.
(14) "Wild buffalo or bison" or "wild buffalo" means a bison that:
(a) has not been reduced to captivity;
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 57

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 57.1
(b) has never been subject to the per capita fee under 15-24-921;
(c) has never been owned by a person; and
(d) is not the offspring of a bison that has been subject to the per capita fee under 15-24-921."

Section 2. Section 87-6-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-6-101. Definitions. Unless the context requires otherwise, in this chapter, the following definitions
apply:
(1) "Alternative livestock" means a privately owned caribou, white-tailed deer, mule deer, elk,
moose, antelope, mountain sheep, or mountain goat indigenous to the state of Montana, a privately owned
reindeer, or any other cloven-hoofed ungulate as classified by the department. Black bear and mountain lion
must be regulated pursuant to Title 87, chapter 4, part 8.
(2) "Alternative livestock ranch" means the enclosed land area upon which alternative livestock
may be kept for purposes of obtaining, rearing in captivity, keeping, or selling alternative livestock or parts of
alternative livestock, as authorized under Title 87, chapter 4, part 4.
(3) "Aircraft" means any manned or unmanned aerial vehicle or device that is used or intended to
be used for flight in the air.
(4) (a) "Bait" means any animal matter, vegetable matter, or natural or artificial scent placed in an
area inhabited by wildlife for the purpose of attracting game animals or game birds.
(b) The term does not include:
(i) decoys, silhouettes, or other replicas of wildlife body forms;
(ii) scents used only to mask human odor; or
(iii) types of scents that are approved by the commission for attracting game animals or game
birds.
(5) "Closed season" means the time during which game birds, fish, game animals, and fur-bearing
animals may not be lawfully taken.
(6) "Cloven-hoofed ungulate" means an animal of the order Artiodactyla, except a member of the
families Suidae, Camelidae, or Hippopotamidae. The term does not include domestic pigs, domestic cows,
domestic yaks, domestic sheep, domestic goats that are not naturally occurring in the wild in their country of
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 57

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 57.1
origin, or bison.
(7) "Conviction" means a judgment or sentence entered following a guilty plea, a nolo contendere
plea, a verdict or finding of guilty rendered by a legally constituted jury or by a court of competent jurisdiction
authorized to try the case without a jury, or a forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person's
appearance in court that has not been vacated.
(8) "Field trial" has the meaning provided in 87-3-601.
(9) "Fishing" means to take or harvest fish or the act of a person possessing any instrument,
article, or substance for the purpose of taking or harvesting fish in any location that a fish might inhabit.
(10) (a) "Fur dealer" means a person engaging in, carrying on, or conducting wholly or in part the
business of buying or selling, trading, or dealing within the state of Montana in the skins or pelts of fur-bearing
animals or predatory animals.
(b) If a fur dealer resides in Montana or if the fur dealer's principal place of business is within the
state of Montana, the fur dealer is considered a resident fur dealer. All other fur dealers are considered
nonresident fur dealers.
(11) "Fur farm" means enclosed land on which furbearers are kept for purposes of obtaining, rearing
in captivity, keeping, and selling furbearers or parts of furbearers.
(12) (a) "Fur-bearing animal" or "furbearer" means marten or sable, otter, muskrat, fisher, mink,
bobcat, lynx, wolverine, northern swift fox, and beaver.
(b) As used in Title 87, chapter 4, part 10, "furbearer" does not include fox or mink.
(13) "Game animal" means deer, elk, moose, antelope, caribou, mountain sheep, mountain goat,
mountain lion, bear, and wild buffalo.
(14) "Game fish" means all species of the family Salmonidae (chars, trout, salmon, grayling, and
whitefish); all species of the genus Stizostedion (sandpike or sauger and walleyed pike or yellowpike perch); all
species of the genus Esox (northern pike, pickerel, and muskellunge); all species of the genus Micropterus
(bass); all species of the genus Polyodon (paddlefish); all species of the family Acipenseridae (sturgeon); all
species of the genus Lota (burbot or ling); the species Perca flavescens (yellow perch); all species of the genus
Pomoxis (crappie); and the species Ictalurus punctatus (channel catfish).
(15) "Hunt" means to pursue, shoot, wound, take, harvest, kill, chase, lure, possess, or capture or
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 57

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 57.1
the act of a person possessing a weapon, as defined in 45-2-101, or using a dog or a bird of prey for the
purpose of shooting, wounding, taking, harvesting, killing, possessing, or capturing wildlife protected by the
laws of this state in any location that wildlife may inhabit, whether or not the wildlife is then or subsequently
taken. The term includes an attempt to take or harvest by any means, including but not limited to pursuing,
shooting, wounding, killing, chasing, luring, possessing, or capturing.
(16) "Knowingly" has the meaning provided in 45-2-101.
(17) "Livestock" includes ostriches, rheas, and emus.
(18) "Migratory game bird" means waterfowl, including wild ducks, wild geese, brant, and swans;
cranes, including little brown and sandhill; rails, including coots; Wilson's snipes or jacksnipes; and mourning
doves.
(19) "Negligently" has the meaning provided in 45-2-101.
(20) "Nongame wildlife" means any wild mammal, bird, amphibian, reptile, fish, mollusk, crustacean,
or other animal not otherwise legally classified by statute or regulation of this state.
(21) "Open season" means the time during which game birds, fish, and game and fur-bearing
animals may be lawfully taken.
(22) "Participating state" means any state that enacts legislation to become a member of the
Interstate Wildlife Violator Compact.
(23) "Person" means an individual, association, partnership, and corporation.
(24) "Possession" has the meaning provided in 45-2-101.
(25) "Predatory animal" means coyote, weasel, skunk, and civet cat.
(26) "Purposely" has the meaning provided in 45-2-101.
(27) "Raptor" means all birds of the orders Falconiformes and Strigiformes, commonly called
falcons, hawks, eagles, ospreys, and owls.
(28) "Resident" has the meaning provided in 87-2-102.
(29) "Roadside menagerie" means any place where one or more wild animals are kept in captivity
for the evident purpose of exhibition or attracting trade, on or off the facility premises. It does not include the
exhibition of any animal by an educational institution or by a traveling theatrical exhibition or circus based
outside of Montana.
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 57

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 57.1
(30) "Sale" means a contract by which a person:
(a) transfers an interest in either game or fish for a price; or
(b) transfers, barters, or exchanges an interest either in game or fish for an article or thing of value.
(31) "Site of the kill" means the location where a game animal or game bird expires and the person
responsible for the death takes physical possession of the carcass.
(32) "Supplemental feed attractant" means any food, garbage, or other attractant for game animals.
The term does not include growing plants or plants harvested for the feeding of livestock.
(33) "Taxidermist" means a person who conducts a business for the purpose of mounting,
preserving, or preparing all or part of the dead bodies of any wildlife.
(34) "Trap" means to take or harvest or participate in the taking or harvesting of any wildlife
protected by state law by setting or placing any mechanical device, snare, deadfall, pit, or device intended to
take wildlife or to remove wildlife from any of these devices.
(35) "Upland game birds" means sharptailed grouse, blue grouse, spruce (Franklin) grouse, prairie
chicken, sage hen or sage grouse, ruffed grouse, ring-necked pheasant, Hungarian partridge, ptarmigan, wild
turkey, and chukar partridge, California quail, and Gambel's quail.
(36) "Wild animal" means an animal that is wild by nature as distinguished from common domestic
animals, whether the animal was bred or reared in captivity, and includes birds and reptiles.
(37) "Wild animal menagerie" means any place where one or more bears or large cats, including
cougars, lions, tigers, jaguars, leopards, pumas, cheetahs, ocelots, and hybrids of those large cats, are kept in
captivity for use other than public exhibition.
(38) "Wild buffalo or bison" or "wild buffalo" means a bison that:
(a) has not been reduced to captivity;
(b) has never been subject to the per capita fee under 15-24-921;
(c) has never been owned by a person; and
(d) is not the offspring of a bison that has been subject to the per capita fee under 15-24-921.
(39) "Wildlife sanctuary" means a facility organized as a Montana nonprofit corporation pursuant to
Title 35, chapter 2, or in good standing with and accredited by the American sanctuary association or the global
federation of animal sanctuaries for the purpose of providing homes for nonreleasable wild animals.
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 57

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 57.1
Accreditation and good standing must be proven with a copy of an accreditation report completed as required
by the accrediting organization.
(40) "Zoo" means any zoological garden chartered as a nonprofit corporation by the state or in good
standing with and accredited by the association of zoos and aquariums or the zoological association of America
for the purpose of exhibiting wild animals for public viewing. Accreditation and good standing must be proven
with a copy of an accreditation report completed as required by the accrediting organization."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective March 1, 2026.
- END -
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 57